Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
ARTICLE 3
POLITICAL PARTY ORGANIZATION

Editor's note:

Articles 1 to 13 were repealed and reenacted in 1980. This article was numbered as article 9 of chapter 49, C.R.S. 1963. For additional historical information concerning the repeal and reenactment of articles 1 to 13 of this title in 1980, see the editor's note immediately following the title heading for this title.

Cross references:

For election offenses relating to political party organization, see part 3 of article 13 of this title.

Section

1-3-100.3. Definitions.

As used in this article:

"Political party" means a major political party as defined in section 1-1-104 (22).

Source:

L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 256, § 3, effective April 13.

1-3-101. Party affiliation required - residence.

In order to vote at any precinct caucus, assembly, or convention of a political party, the elector must be a resident of the precinct for twenty-two days, must be registered to vote no later than twenty-two days before the caucus, assembly, or convention, and must be affiliated with the political party holding the caucus, assembly, or convention for at least twenty-two days as shown in the statewide voter registration system; except that any registered elector who has attained the age of eighteen years or who has become a naturalized citizen during the twenty-two days immediately preceding the meeting may vote at any caucus, assembly, or convention even though the elector has been affiliated with the political party for less than twenty-two days. If allowed by a political party's rules, a preregistrant may vote at any caucus, assembly, or convention if the preregistrant has been a resident of the precinct for twenty-two days before the caucus, assembly, or convention, and has been affiliated with the political party holding the caucus, assembly, or convention for at least twenty-two days as shown in the statewide voter registration system; except that a preregistrant who preregistered within the twenty-two days immediately preceding the meeting may vote at any caucus, assembly, or convention even though the preregistrant has been affiliated with the political party for less than twenty-two days.

If an elector desires to vote at a precinct caucus but the elector's eligibility cannot be verified upon examination of the list of registered electors provided in accordance with subsection (3) of this section, the elector shall complete an affidavit attesting to the facts establishing the elector's eligibility. The secretary of state shall promulgate rules prescribing the form and content of the affidavit.

Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section and section 1-2-101 (1)(b), an elector who moves from the precinct where registered during the twenty-one days prior to any caucus may participate in and vote at the caucus in the precinct of the elector's former residence but shall not be eligible for election as a delegate or for nomination as a precinct committeeperson in the former precinct.

No later than twenty-one days prior to the date of the precinct caucus, or eighteen days prior to the date of the precinct caucus in a year in which a political party's precinct caucus is held on the first Saturday following the presidential primary election, the county clerk and recorder shall furnish without charge to each major political party in the county a list of the registered electors in the county who are affiliated with that political party. Notwithstanding section 1-2-227 (2), the list must include preregistrants whose information is otherwise confidential.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 315, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 302, § 1, effective April 29; (1) amended, p. 291, § 5, effective June 19.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 618, § 28, effective May 1.

L. 92:

Entire article amended, p. 664, § 3, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

(3) added, p. 1153, § 11, effective July 1; entire section amended, p. 1767, § 22, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 828, § 23, effective July 1.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 760, § 15, effective May 20.

L. 2002:

(3) amended, p. 131, § 1, effective March 27.

L. 2007:

(3)(a) amended, p. 1988, § 2, effective August 3.

L. 2016:

(1) amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 574, § 25, effective May 18.

L. 2018:

(1), (2), and (3)(a) amended, (SB 18-233), ch. 262, p. 1606, § 8, effective May 29.

L. 2019:

(1) amended, (HB 19-1278), ch. 326, p. 3009, § 12, effective August 2.

L. 2020:

(1)(a) and (3)(a) amended, (HB 20-1289), ch. 2, p. 3, § 1, effective March 3.

L. 2021:

(1)(a) and (3)(a) amended, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1636, § 11, effective June 21.

1-3-102. Precinct caucuses.

Precinct committeepersons and delegates to county assemblies must be elected at precinct caucuses that must be held in a public place or in a private home that is open to the public during the caucus in or proximate to each precinct at a time and place to be fixed by the county central committee or executive committee of each political party. The precinct caucuses must be held in each even-numbered year on a date no earlier than the first Tuesday in March and no later than the first Saturday after the first Tuesday in March. The county central committee shall notify the secretary of state and the clerk and recorder of each county in the state of the precinct caucus date on or before January 2 of the year in which the election is held.
(1) (a) (I) Precinct committeepersons and delegates to county assemblies must be elected at precinct caucuses that must be held in a public place or in a private home that is open to the public during the caucus in or proximate to each precinct at a time and place to be fixed by the county central committee or executive committee of each political party. The precinct caucuses must be held in each even-numbered year on a date no earlier than the first Tuesday in March and no later than the first Saturday after the first Tuesday in March. The county central committee shall notify the secretary of state and the clerk and recorder of each county in the state of the precinct caucus date on or before January 2 of the year in which the election is held.

and (III) Repealed.

Any private home in which a precinct caucus is to be held shall be accessible to persons with disabilities in accordance with the rules of the county central committee or executive committee of each political party. The rules shall specify guidelines for determining whether a private home is accessible to persons with disabilities for purposes of this subsection (1) and for determining controversies regarding such accessibility.

The participants at the precinct caucus shall also elect two precinct committeepersons. Any person eighteen years of age or older, or a person sixteen years of age or older who is preregistered to vote, may be a candidate for the office of precinct committeeperson if he or she has been a resident of the precinct for twenty-two days and has been affiliated with the political party holding the precinct caucus for a period of at least twenty-two days preceding the date of the precinct caucus; except that any person who has attained the age of eighteen years, has attained the age of sixteen years and has preregistered to vote, or who has become a naturalized citizen during the twenty-two days immediately preceding the precinct caucus may be a candidate for the office of precinct committeeperson even though he or she has been affiliated with the political party for less than twenty-two days as shown in the statewide voter registration system. The two people receiving the highest number of votes at the caucus for precinct committeeperson are elected as the precinct committeepersons of the precinct. If two or more candidates for precinct committeeperson receive an equal and the second highest number of votes, or if three or more candidates receive an equal and the highest number of votes, the election must be determined by lot by those candidates. All disputes regarding the election of precinct committeepersons are determined by the credentials committees of the respective party assemblies. The names of the committeepersons elected must be certified to the county assembly of the political party by the officers of the caucus. The presiding officer and secretary of the county assembly shall file a certified list of the names and addresses, by precinct, of those persons elected as precinct committeepersons with the county clerk and recorder within four days after the date of the county assembly.

Within ten days after the boundaries of an existing precinct are changed or a new precinct is created, the members of the party county central committee vacancy committee shall select members to fill the vacancies for precinct committeepersons.

Repealed.

The person elected as committeeperson at the caucus shall assume the office immediately following the caucus. Causes for removal of the elected committeeperson from office shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

In the case of removal by the credentials committee at the county assembly, the person does not meet the qualifications for committeeperson;

In the case of removal by the county central committee, the person has moved from the precinct or has changed affiliation.

Repealed.

Repealed.

Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, a participant at a precinct caucus may participate remotely, including casting the participant's vote by e-mail, mail, telephone, or through an internet-based application if allowed by the party's rules.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 315, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 81:

(2)(a) and (2)(b) amended, (2)(c) and (2)(d) added, and (3) and (4) repealed, pp. 304, 309, §§ 1, 12, effective January 1, 1982.

L. 82:

(2)(a) amended, p. 216, § 1, effective February 19.

L. 85:

(1) amended, p. 248, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 90:

(1) amended, p. 303, § 3, effective June 8.

L. 91:

(2)(a) amended, p. 618, § 29, effective May 1.

L. 92:

Entire article amended, p. 665, § 3, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(2)(c) and (2)(d)(III) repealed, p. 1404, § 28, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(2)(a) amended, p. 1768, § 23, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(2)(a) amended, p. 828, § 24, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(1) amended, p. 633, § 4, effective May 6.

L. 99:

(1) and (2)(a) amended, p. 761, § 16, effective May 20; (1) amended, p. 100, § 1, effective August 4; (2)(d)(II) amended, p. 159, § 6, effective August 4.

L. 2001:

(1) amended, p. 1001, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2002:

(1)(a) amended, p. 132, § 2, effective March 27.

L. 2005:

(1)(a)(I) amended, p. 1398, § 12, effective June 6; (1)(a)(I) amended, p. 1433, § 12, effective June 6.

L. 2007:

(1)(a)(I) amended and (1)(a)(III) added, p. 1988, § 3, effective August 3.

L. 2011:

(1)(a)(I) amended, (SB 11-189), ch. 243, p. 1062, § 2, effective May 27.

L. 2016:

(2)(a) amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 574, § 26, effective May 18.

Initiated 2016:

(1)(a)(III) amended, Proposition 107, effective upon proclamation of the Governor, December 27, 2016. See L. 2017, p. 2820.

L. 2019:

(1)(a)(III) amended, (HB 19-1278), ch. 326, p. 3009, § 13, effective August 2.

L. 2020:

(2)(a) amended, (HB 20-1289), ch. 2, p. 3, § 2, effective March 3.

L. 2021:

(1)(a)(I) and (2)(a) amended, (1)(a)(III) repealed, and (5) added, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1637, § 12, effective June 21.

1-3-103. Party committees.

At its own precinct caucus, each political party shall elect two committeepersons for each election precinct as provided in section 1-3-102. Each committeeperson shall hold the position for a term of two years after the date of the election, and each shall serve until a successor is duly elected or appointed and commences the term of office. In case of a vacancy in the office of precinct committeeperson, the vacancy may be filled by the members of the county central committee vacancy committee. If the county central committee vacancy committee does not fill the vacancy within thirty days of the vacancy occurring, the vacancy may be filled by the recommendation of the county chair, subject to ratification by the county central committee. If the county chair does not fill the vacancy within sixty days of the vacancy occurring, the vacancy may be filled by recommendation of the state chair, subject to ratification by the county central committee. The person selected must be a resident of the precinct in which the vacancy occurred.

All of the precinct committeepersons of the political party in the county, all of the district captains and co-captains, if any, of the political party in the county, and the county party officers selected pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection (1), together with the elected county public officials, the state senators and representatives, the United States senators and representatives, the elected state public officials, and the district attorney, who are members of the party and who reside within the county, shall constitute the membership of the county central committee, but the multiple office shall not entitle a person to more than one vote, excluding proxies.

In counties which have adopted a five-commissioner board or county home rule, such county central committee shall be constituted of all the precinct committeepersons from precincts in the county commissioner district, together with the officers selected pursuant to this subparagraph (II), and the state senators and representatives and the district attorney who are members of the party and who reside within the district. Such county central committee shall meet on the same date and select a chairperson and vice-chairperson in the same manner as the county central committee. Such central committee shall select a vacancy committee for the purpose of filling vacancies in the office of county commissioner held by members of the political party.

Each county central committee shall meet on a date which falls between February 1 and February 15 of the odd-numbered years to organize by selecting a chairperson, a vice-chairperson, and a secretary and any other officers provided for in the county rules and shall select a vacancy committee authorized to fill vacancies in the county central committee and the offices held by members of the county central committee and shall select a separate vacancy committee to fill vacancies in the office of county commissioner held by members of the political party.

Except as provided in paragraph (d) of subsection (4), paragraph (b) of subsection (5), and paragraph (b) of subsection (6) of this section, all other central committees shall meet on a date which falls between February 15 and April 1 of the odd-numbered years to organize by electing a chairperson, a vice-chairperson, and a secretary and shall select a vacancy committee authorized to fill vacancies in the central committees and in district and state offices held by members of the political party.

Repealed.

The state central committee shall consist of the chairpersons and vice-chairpersons of the several party county central committees, together with the elected United States senators, representatives in congress, governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, state treasurer, attorney general, members of the board of regents, members of the state board of education, state senators, and state representatives, and any additional members as provided for by the state central committee bylaws. Two additional members shall be allowed the political party from each county that polled at least ten thousand votes at the last preceding general election for its candidate for governor or president of the United States. Two additional members shall be allowed for each additional ten thousand votes or major portion thereof so polled in the county. The additional members shall be elected by the county central committee of the political party.

Within ten days after the adjournment of the organizational meeting of the state central committee of any political party, the chairperson and secretary of the state central committee shall file under oath with the secretary of state a full and complete roll of the membership of the state central committee.

The chairpersons and vice-chairpersons of the several party county central committees entirely or partially, who reside within each congressional district, together with the elected congressperson, the elected state board of education member of the party for the congressional district, the elected board of regents member of the party for the congressional district, and the state senators and representatives of the party who reside within the congressional district, shall constitute the party congressional central committee.

If, in any county, or portion thereof, within the congressional district, any political party has polled at least ten thousand votes at the last preceding general election for its candidate for governor or president of the United States, the county shall be entitled to two additional members of the congressional central committee of the political party. Two additional members shall be allowed for each additional ten thousand votes or major portion thereof so polled by the party in the county or portion thereof within the congressional district. The additional members shall reside within the congressional district and shall be elected by those members of the county central committee of the political party who reside within the congressional district. The additional members shall be as equally divided as possible between male and female.

Other members of the congressional central committees may be provided for by the state central committee bylaws.

Each party congressional district central committee shall elect its own chairperson, vice-chairperson, and secretary and shall adopt its own bylaws concerning its conduct, which shall include but need not be limited to requirements for eligibility to vote in the congressional district assembly.

The chairperson of each party congressional district central committee shall fix the time and place of each meeting of the committee, shall fix the time and place of its congressional district assembly, and shall preside over each meeting and the congressional district assembly.

The chairpersons and vice-chairpersons of the several party county central committees, who reside within each judicial district, together with the elected district attorney of the party for the judicial district, shall constitute the judicial district central committee.

If, in any county within the judicial district, any political party has polled at least ten thousand votes at the last preceding general election for its candidate for governor or president of the United States, the county shall be entitled to two additional members of the judicial district central committee of the political party. Two additional members shall be allowed for each additional ten thousand votes or major portion thereof polled in the county. The additional members shall be elected by those members of the county central committee of the political party who reside within the judicial district. The additional members shall be as equally divided as possible between male and female.

Other members of the judicial district central committee may be provided for by the state central committee bylaws.

When a judicial district is comprised of one county or a portion of one county, the judicial district central committee shall consist of all elected precinct committeepersons, the elected district attorney, and the chairperson, the vice-chairperson, and the secretary of the county central committee, all of whom are of the party and reside in that judicial district. The committee shall meet on the same date and select a chairperson and vice-chairperson in the same manner as a party county central committee.

Each party judicial district central committee shall elect its own chairperson, vice-chairperson, and secretary and shall adopt its own bylaws concerning its conduct, which shall include but need not be limited to requirements for eligibility to vote in the judicial district assembly.

The chairperson of each party judicial district central committee shall fix the time and place of each meeting of the committee, shall fix the time and place of its district assembly, and shall preside over each meeting and the judicial district assembly.

When a state senatorial district is comprised of one or more whole counties or of a part of one county and all or a part of one or more other counties, a state senatorial central committee shall consist of the chairpersons, vice-chairpersons, and secretary of the several party county central committees, who reside within the state senatorial district. If any of those officers do not reside in the state senatorial district, replacements shall be provided who do reside in the district. The state senatorial central committee shall also include the elected state senator of the party for the state senatorial district, the state representatives of the party who reside within the state senatorial district, and a chairperson, vice-chairperson, and secretary of the state senatorial central committee, who may or may not be elected from among, but shall be elected by, the chairpersons, vice-chairpersons, and secretary, the state senator, and the state representatives.

When a state senatorial district is comprised of a portion of one county, a state senatorial central committee shall consist of the elected precinct committeepersons, the elected state senator, the elected state representatives, and a chairperson, vice-chairperson, and secretary of the state senatorial central committee, all of whom are of the party and reside in that senatorial district. In addition, the chairperson, vice-chairperson, and secretary of the party county central committee shall be members of each state senatorial central committee, who reside within the senatorial district. The chairperson, vice-chairperson, and secretary of the state senatorial central committee may or may not be elected from among, but shall be elected by, the state senatorial central committee. The committee shall meet on the same date and select a chairperson and vice-chairperson in the same manner as the party county central committee.

When a state representative district is comprised of one or more whole counties or of a part of one county and all or a part of one or more other counties, a state representative central committee shall consist of the chairpersons, vice-chairpersons, and secretary of the several party county central committees, who reside within the state representative district. If any of those officers do not reside in the state representative district, replacements shall be provided who do reside in the district. The state representative central committee shall also include the elected state representative of the party for the state representative district, each state senator of the party who resides within that representative district, and a chairperson, vice-chairperson, and secretary of the state representative central committee, who may or may not be elected from among, but shall be elected by, the chairpersons, vice-chairpersons, and secretary, the state representative, and the state senators.

When a state representative district is comprised of a portion of one county, a state representative central committee shall consist of the elected precinct committeepersons, the elected state representative, the elected state senators, and a chairperson, vice-chairperson, and secretary of the state representative central committee, all of whom are of the party and reside in that state representative district. In addition, the chairperson, vice-chairperson, and secretary of the party county central committee, who reside within the state representative district, shall be members of the state representative central committee. The chairperson, vice-chairperson, and secretary of the state representative district central committee may or may not be elected from among, but shall be elected by, the state representative central committee. The committee shall meet on the same date and select a chairperson and vice-chairperson in the same manner as the party county central committee.

No later than thirty days after the organizational meetings authorized by this section, the secretary of each party central committee prescribed by this section shall file with the state party a list of the names, addresses, and telephone numbers of each of the officers elected, together with a list of the names, addresses, and telephone numbers of the vacancy committee selected. No later than forty-five days after the organizational meetings authorized by this section, the state party shall file with the secretary of state a compiled list of all the officers elected and vacancy committee members selected along with their addresses and telephone numbers.

All references to elected public officials in this article shall include those public officials appointed to fill vacancies in elective offices.

No later than ninety days after the organization of the state central committees of the major political parties in each odd-numbered year, each committee shall adopt in its bylaws or rules its general guidelines and regulations for all county party matters. Such bylaws or rules shall establish a procedure for the selection of delegates to any party assembly that is consistent with party practice. Any method under such procedure for choosing or allocating delegates in a county based on the number of votes cast at an election for a particular candidate shall be uniform among the counties so that all types of ballots are counted or not counted for purposes of determining the number of votes cast. Any county central committee may adopt its own rules in conformance with those of the state central committee. In the absence of county rules pertaining to specific items, the party's state central committee's guidelines and rules shall apply. Each state central committee shall file its party's bylaws or rules with the secretary of state no later than the first Monday in February in each even-numbered year and, if filed prior to that date, the bylaws or rules may be amended until that date. Except as provided in subsection (9)(c) of this section, no bylaw or rule may be filed or amended after the first Monday in February in each even-numbered year. Where the bylaws or rules are not filed in accordance with this section, the party's state central committee, as well as the party's county central committee, are subject to the code through the general election of the same year. Each state central committee shall compile and provide to the secretary of state information concerning the membership of the county central committees of the party in addition to the bylaws or rules of each county central committee.

Repealed.

Each party state senatorial central committee and each party state representative central committee shall elect its own chairperson, vice-chairperson, and secretary and adopt its own bylaws concerning its conduct, which shall include, but not be limited to, the listing of requirements for eligibility to vote in the state senatorial or state representative district assembly.

The chairperson of each party state senatorial central committee and each party state representative central committee shall fix the time and place of meetings of the central committee, shall fix the time and place of its district assembly, and shall preside over the meetings and district assembly.

Repealed.

If a central committee of a jurisdiction fails to select a vacancy committee, the central committee of the jurisdiction serves as the vacancy committee.

In selecting the members of a vacancy committee authorized to fill vacancies in office pursuant to this section, the central committee of a jurisdiction shall select, at a minimum, the members of the jurisdiction's central committee.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, pp. 316, 421, §§ 1, 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 81:

(1)(a), (1)(b), (4)(d), (5)(b), and (6)(b) amended, p. 305, § 2, effective January 1, 1982.

L. 82:

(1)(e) added, p. 218, § 1, effective April 2.

L. 83:

(1)(b)(II), (1)(c), (1)(d), and (7) amended, p. 360, § 1, effective May 20.

L. 85:

(3)(b) and (4)(b) amended and (3)(d), (3)(e), (4)(e), and (4)(f) added, pp. 255, 256, §§ 5, 6, effective May 31.

L. 87:

(5) and (6) amended, p. 284, § 5, effective June 26.

L. 89:

(9) amended, p. 313, § 1, effective April 12; (3)(a), (4)(a), (5), and (6) amended, p. 301, § 5, effective May 9.

L. 91:

(5)(a), (6)(a), and (9) amended, p. 619, § 30, effective May 1.

L. 92:

(9) amended, p. 591, § 2, effective April 10; entire article amended, p. 666, § 3, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(2)(b) amended, p. 1765, § 2, effective June 6.

L. 96:

(9) amended, p. 1738, § 19, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(9) amended, p. 814, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 99:

(7) and (9) amended, p. 761, § 17, effective May 20.

L. 2002:

(9) amended, p. 132, § 3, effective March 27.

L. 2012:

(9)(a) amended, (HB 12-1292), ch. 181, p. 679, § 9, effective May 17.

L. 2018:

(9)(a) amended, (SB 18-233), ch. 262, p. 1607, § 9, effective May 29.

L. 2019:

(7) amended, (HB 19-1278), ch. 326, p. 3009, § 14, effective August 2.

L. 2020:

(9)(a) amended and (9)(c) added, (HB 20-1359), ch. 23, p. 82, § 1, effective March 16.

L. 2021:

(11) added, (HB 21-1001), ch. 1, p. 1, § 1, effective January 20; (1)(a) amended and (12) added, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1638, § 13, effective June 21.

L. 2022:

(13) added, (HB 22-1044), ch. 83, p. 403, § 1, effective August 10.

1-3-104. Political party vacancy committees.

All vacancies in state, congressional, judicial, senatorial, representative, or county commissioner party central committees shall be filled by the respective party county central committees pursuant to section 1-3-103.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 320, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 92:

Entire article amended, p. 671, § 3, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-14-110 (2) as it existed prior to 1980.

1-3-105. Powers of central committees.

Subject to the provisions of section 1-3-106 (2), the state central committee has the power to make all rules for party government.

Any state, congressional, judicial, senatorial, representative, county commissioner, or county central committee may select a managing or executive committee and may authorize the executive committee to exercise any and all powers conferred upon the respective central committees.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 320, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 92:

Entire article amended, p. 671, § 3, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2020:

(3) added, (HB 20-1359), ch. 23, p. 86, § 2, effective March 16.

1-3-106. Control of party controversies.

The state central committee of any political party in this state has full power to pass upon and determine all controversies concerning the regularity of the organization of that party within any congressional, judicial, senatorial, representative, or county commissioner district or within any county and also concerning the right to the use of the party name. The state central committee may make rules governing the method of passing upon and determining controversies as it deems best, unless the rules have been provided by the state convention of the party as provided in subsection (2) of this section. All determinations upon the part of the state central committee shall be final.

From the time the state convention of the party convenes until the time of its final adjournment, the state convention has all the powers given by subsection (1) of this section to the state central committee, but not otherwise. The state convention of the party may also provide rules that shall govern the state central committee in the exercise of the powers conferred upon the committee in subsection (1) of this section.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 320, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 92:

Entire article amended, p. 671, § 3, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-14-109 as it existed prior to 1980.

Cross references:

For congressional districts, see § 2-1-101.

1-3-107. Party platforms.

Any assembly or convention of any political party may formulate, adopt, and publish a platform for the political subdivision which the assembly or convention represents.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 321, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 85:

(2) repealed, p. 270, § 37, effective May 31.

L. 92:

Entire article amended, p. 672, § 3, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-14-111 as it existed prior to 1980.

1-3-108. Use of party name.

No person, group of persons, or organization shall use the name or address of a political party, in any manner, unless the person, group of persons, or organization has received permission to use the name or address from the executive committee of the political party.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire section added, p. 285, § 6, effective June 26.

L. 92:

Entire article amended, p. 672, § 3, effective January 1, 1993.